District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.114

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed in accordance with this subchapter, no person shall use the words or terms “land surveyor”, or “licensed land surveyor,” or any words for the purpose of implying that the person is authorized to perform the services of a land surveyor in the District.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.114.